Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-1101
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-1101 to 71-1134 shall be known and may be cited
as the Developmental Disabilities Court-Ordered Custody Act.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 29.